Alabama, session 2026rs, HB111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. For the purposes of this act, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) EMBRYO. An organism of the species homo sapiens
from the single cell stage to eight weeks of development. This
term includes an embryo that is derived by fertilization,
parthenogenesis, human cloning, or any other means from one or
more human gametes or human diploid cells.
Page 1

more human gametes or human diploid cells.
HB111 INTRODUCED
(2) FETUS. An organism of the species homo sapiens from
eight weeks of development until complete expulsion or
extraction from a woman's body, removal from an artificial
womb, or other similar environment designed to nurture the
development of the organism.
(3) HUMAN CLONING. a. The process of human asexual
reproduction, accomplished by:
1. Introducing the genetic material from one or more
human somatic cells into a fertilized or unfertilized oocyte
whose nuclear material has been removed or inactivated so as
to produce a living organism, at any stage of development,
that is genetically virtually identical to an existing or
previously existing human organism;
2. Artificially subdividing a human embryo at any time
from the two-cell stage onward resulting in more than one
human organism;
3. Introducing pluripotent stem cells from any source
into a human embryo or artificially manufactured human embryo
or trophoblast under conditions where the introduced cells
generate all or most of the body tissues of the
fully-developed living organism; or
4. Genetically modifying human skin cells or organisms
into viable oocyte or sperm with genetic material from the
same source as the oocyte or sperm used in reproduction to
create an embryo.
b. This term does not apply to in vitro fertilization,
the administration of fertility-enhancing drugs, or other
procedures used to assist a woman in becoming or remaining
Page 2

procedures used to assist a woman in becoming or remaining
HB111 INTRODUCED
pregnant, unless performed with specific intent to result in
the gestation or birth of a child genetically identical to
another embryo, fetus, or human being, living or dead.
(4) OOCYTE. The human female germ cell, the egg.
(5) SOMATIC CELL. A diploid cell, having a complete set
of chromosomes, obtained or derived from a living or deceased
human body at any stage of development.
Section 2. (a) A person commits the crime of human
cloning if the person intentionally does any of the following:
(1) Performs or attempts to perform human cloning.
(2) Participates in an attempt to perform human
cloning.
(3) Ships, transfers, or receives for any purpose an
embryo produced by human cloning.
(4) Ships, transfers, or receives, in whole or in part,
any oocyte, embryo, fetus, or human somatic cell for the
purpose of human cloning.
(b) A violation of this section is a Class C felony.
Section 3. This act does not restrict areas of
scientific research not specifically prohibited by this act,
including research into the use of nuclear transfer or other
cloning techniques to produce molecules, deoxyribonucleic
acid, cells other than embryos, tissues, organs, plants, or
animals other than humans.
Section 4. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3